Texas statutes.
NATURAL RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 3. OIL AND GAS

SUBTITLE D. REGULATION OF SPECIFIC BUSINESSES AND OCCUPATIONS

CHAPTER 118. PIPELINE ASSESSMENT AND TESTING

Sec. 118.001. AUTHORITY TO REQUIRE PLAN FOR PIPELINE ASSESSMENT OR TESTING. (a) The Railroad Commission of Texas by rule may require an operator to file for commission approval a plan for assessment or testing of a pipeline if the commission finds that:

(1) there is reason to believe that the pipeline may present a hazard to public health or safety;

(2) the commission lacks adequate information to assess the risk to public health or safety presented by the pipeline; or

(3) a plan is necessary for the commission to initiate or complete a pipeline safety investigation.

(b) The Railroad Commission of Texas may take enforcement action against a person who fails to:

(1) submit a required plan; or

(2) participate in a pipeline safety investigation.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 118.002. PIPELINES FOR WHICH PLAN MAY BE REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the rules adopted under this chapter may apply to interstate pipelines, intrastate pipelines, portions of pipeline systems the regulation of which the federal government has temporarily delegated to the Railroad Commission of Texas, or gathering lines, and to pipelines for the transportation of any substance or material under the jurisdiction of the commission, as specified by the commission.

(b) Exempted from the application of this chapter are gathering lines outside:

(1) the limits of an incorporated or unincorporated city or village;

(2) any designated residential or commercial area such as residential subdivisions, businesses, shopping centers, or community development.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1273, Sec. 1, eff. June 21, 2003.

Sec. 118.003. CONTENTS OF PLAN. The rules adopted under this chapter may require that a plan include:

(1) an identification of risk factors associated with a pipeline system, including population density;

(2) information about previous inspections and maintenance;

(3) information about pressure tests;

(4) information about leaks;

(5) information about operating characteristics;

(6) information about corrosion protection methods; and

(7) other information that may assist the Railroad Commission of Texas in assessing the risk to public health or safety presented by the pipeline.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 118.004. APPROVAL OF PLAN. The Railroad Commission of Texas may approve a plan that complies with rules adopted under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 118.005. CONSEQUENCES OF PLAN APPROVAL. The approval of a plan by the Railroad Commission of Texas does not constitute a certification or representation that the pipeline is in compliance with or exempt from applicable safety standards.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1233, Sec. 62, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.